Maryland, session 2025, SB0684.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment.
Italics indicate opposite chamber/conference co mm i tte e a m en dm en ts*. sb0684*

SENATE BILL 684
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 55. HEALTH EQUITY DASHBOARD.
13–5501.
(A) (1) THE DEPARTMENT, IN COLLABORATION WITH THE COMMISSION
ON HEALTH EQUITY, SHALL DEVELOP A CLEAR AND EASY–TO–UNDERSTAND
GRAPHIC DATA DASHBOARD THAT INCLUDES AGE–ADJUSTED HEALTH DISPARITY
DATA DISAGGREGATED BY RACE, ETHNICITY, AND GENDER.
(2) THE DATA DASHBOARD SHALL INCLUDE INFORMATION
REGARDING THE FOLLOWING HEALTH INDICATORS:
(I) HEALTH INSURANCE ACCESS;
(II) CARDIOVASCULAR DISEASE;
(III) CHRONIC DISEASE;
(IV) MENTAL HEALTH AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE USE;
(V) CANCER;
(VI) HIV/AIDS;
(VII) SEXUALLY TRANSMITTED INFECTION; AND
(VIII) BODY MASS INDEX; AND
(IX) ANY OTHER HEALTH INDICATORS DETERMINED RELEVANT
BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) UPDATE THE DATA DASHBOARD DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION AT LEAST EVERY 30 DAYS ON A QUARTERLY BASIS, AS
DETERMINED BY DATA AVAILABILITY; AND
(2) POST THE MOST RECENT UPDATED DATA DASHBOARD
PROMINENTLY ON ITS WEBSITE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.